ro-RO: Stil de montare cu bilă de remorcare: Fix/presat (specific capului de tractare); Încuietoare integrată (nucă cu blocare); Compatibil cu sistem cu schimbare rapidă; Tijă standard (montare cu piuliță); Altele
da: Monteringsstil for anhængertrækkets kugle: Fast/indpresset (specifikt til trækstangshoved); Integreret lås (låsekugle); Kompatibel med lynskiftesystem; Standardskaft (møtrikmonteret); Andet
vi: Kiểu lắp đặt bi móc kéo: Cố định/ép vào (dành riêng cho đầu kéo); Khóa tích hợp (viên bi khóa); Tương thích hệ thống thay thế nhanh; Trục tiêu chuẩn (gắn bằng đai ốc); Khác
th: รูปแบบการติดตั้งหัวบอลลาก: ติดตั้งถาวร/อัดเข้า (เฉพาะหัวลาก); ล็อกในตัว (ลูกหมากแบบล็อก); รองรับระบบเปลี่ยนไว; ก้านมาตรฐาน (ยึดด้วยน็อต); อื่นๆ
tr: Çeki topuzu montaj tipi: Sabit/presli (çeki demiri başına özel); Entegre kilit (kilitli topuz); Hızlı değişim sistemi uyumlu; Standart gövde (somun bağlantılı); Diğer
zh-TW: 拖車球安裝樣式: 固定/壓入式 (拖車架專用); 整合式鎖 (帶鎖拖車球); 相容於快換系統; 標準柄 (螺帽固定); 其他
hr-HR: Način montaže kuke za vuču: Fiksno / uprešano (specifično za glavu kuke); Ugrađena brava (kugla za zaključavanje); Kompatibilno sa sustavom brze izmjene; Standardna drška (montirano maticom); Ostalo
pt-BR: Estilo de montagem da esfera de engate: Fixo/prensado (específico da cabeça do engate); Trava integrada (bola com trava); Compatível com sistema de troca rápida; Haste padrão (montagem com porca); Outros
de: Befestigungsart der Anhängerkupplungskugel: Fest/eingepresst (kupplungskopfspezifisch); Integriertes Schloss (verriegelbarer Kugelkopf); Kompatibel mit Schnellwechselsystem; Standard-Schaft (mutterbefestigt); Andere
el: Στυλ τοποθέτησης σφαίρας κοτσαδόρου: Σταθερό/πρεσαριστό (ειδικά για την κεφαλή του κοτσαδόρου); Ενσωματωμένη κλειδαριά (μπίλια που κλειδώνει); Συμβατό με σύστημα γρήγορης αλλαγής; Τυπικός λαιμός (με στήριξη παξιμαδιού); Άλλο
ja: ヒッチボール取り付けスタイル: 固定式/圧入式 (ヒッチヘッド専用); ロック一体型 (ロッキングボール); クイックチェンジシステム対応; 標準シャンク (ナットマウント式); その他
ru: Тип крепления шара фаркопа: Фиксированный/впрессованный (зависит от головки фаркопа); Встроенный замок (запирающийся шар); Совместим с системой быстрой замены; Стандартный хвостовик (крепление гайкой); Другое
sl-SI: Stil montaže vlečne krogle: Fiksno/vtisnjeno (specifično za glavo vlečne kljuke); Vgrajena ključavnica (zaklepna krogla); Združljivo s sistemom za hitro menjavo; Standardno steblo (montaža z matico); Drugo
en: Hitch ball mounting style: Fixed/pressed-in (hitch-head specific); Integrated lock (locking ball); Quick-change system compatible; Standard shank (nut-mounted); Other
zh-CN: 拖车球安装方式: 固定/压入式（特定于挂车头）; 集成锁（锁球）; 兼容快换系统; 标准柄（螺母安装）; 其他
it: Stile di montaggio della sfera di traino: Fisso/Pressato (specifico per la testa del gancio traino); Serratura integrata (sfera con bloccaggio); Compatibile con sistema a cambio rapido; Codolo standard (fissaggio con dado); Altro
fi: Vetokuulan kiinnitystapa: Kiinteä / sisään painettu (vetopääkohtainen); Integroitu lukko (lukittava kuula); Yhteensopiva pikavaihtojärjestelmän kanssa; Vakiovarsi (mutterikiinnitteinen); Muu
bg-BG: Стил на монтаж на тегличната топка: Фиксирана/пресована (специфична за главата на теглича); Вградена ключалка (заключваща се топка); Съвместима със система за бърза смяна; Стандартно стебло (монтирано с гайка); Други
ko: 히치볼 장착 방식: 고정/압입형(히치 헤드 전용); 일체형 자물쇠(잠금 볼); 퀵체인지 시스템 호환; 표준 섕크(너트 장착형); 기타
nb: Monteringsstil for tilhengerfestekule: Fast/presset inn (spesifikk for kulekobling); Integrert lås (låsekule); Kompatibel med hurtigbyttesystem; Standard skaft (muttermontert); Annet
pl: Styl mocowania kuli haka: Stałe/wciskane (do konkretnej głowicy haka); Zintegrowany zamek (kula z blokadą); Kompatybilne z systemem szybkiej wymiany; Standardowy trzpień (mocowany nakrętką); Inny
sv: Monteringsstil för dragkrokkula: Fast/inpressad (specifik för dragkrokshuvud); Integrerat lås (låsbar kula); Kompatibel med snabbbytessystem; Standardtapp (muttermonterad); Annat
pt-PT: Estilo de montagem da bola de engate: Fixa/prensada (específica da cabeça de engate); Fecho integrado (esfera de bloqueio); Compatível com sistema de troca rápida; Haste normal (montagem com porca); Outro
es: Estilo de montaje de la bola de enganche: Fijo/encajado a presión (específico para la cabeza del enganche); Cerradura integrada (bola con bloqueo); Compatible con sistema de cambio rápido; Vástago estándar (montado con tuerca); Otro
sk-SK: Spôsob montáže ťažnej gule: Pevný/lisovaný (špecifický pre ťažnú hlavu); Integrovaný zámok (uzamykateľná guľa); Kompatibilné so systémom rýchlej výmeny; Štandardná stopka (montáž maticou); Iné
fr: Style de montage de la boule d’attelage: Fixe/à pression (spécifique à la tête d’attelage); Verrou intégré (boule de verrouillage); Compatible avec un système de changement rapide; Tige standard (à écrou); Autre
lt-LT: Priekabos kablio rutulio tvirtinimo stilius: Fiksuotas / įspaustas (pritaikytas grąžulo galvutei); Integruotas užraktas (rakinamas kablys); Suderinamas su greitojo keitimo sistema; Standartinis strypas (tvirtinamas veržle); Kita
hu: Vonóhorog gömbfej rögzítési stílusa: Fix/bepréselt (vonófejspecifikus); Beépített zárral (zárható gömb); Gyorscserés rendszerrel kompatibilis; Normál szár (anyával szerelt); Egyéb
nl: Trekhaakkogel montagestijl: Vast/ingeperst (trekhaakkop-specifiek); Geïntegreerd slot (vergrendelbare kogel); Compatibel met snelwisselsysteem; Standaardschacht (moermontage); Overig
cs: Způsob montáže tažné koule: Pevný/lisovaný (specifický pro tažné zařízení); Integrovaný zámek (uzamykatelný čep); Kompatibilní se systémem rychlé výměny; Standardní dřík (na matici); Jiný